Louisiana, session 2026, HB802.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:3310 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3310. Watershed Restoration and Conservation Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury as a special fund the
Watershed Restoration and Conservation Fund, hereafter referred to in this Section
as "the fund".
B. The purpose of the fund shall be to support the reclamation, restoration,
and long-term stewardship of lands and watersheds within the Amite River Basin
impacted by sand and gravel mining operations, with priority given to flood-prone
areas and impaired watersheds.
C. After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section 9(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the fund one hundred percent of the portion of recurring severance
tax revenues collected on sand severed from within the geographic boundaries of the
district that would have been deposited into the state general fund after allocations
of such revenues otherwise required by the Constitution of Louisiana and the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950. Monies designated for the fund and received
by the state treasurer from donations, gifts, grants, or other revenue shall be
deposited into the fund.
D. Monies in the fund shall be invested in the same manner as monies in the
state general fund. Interest earned on investment of monies in the fund shall be
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 802 ENROLLED
credited to the fund. Unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end
of the fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
E. Monies in the fund shall be appropriated to the Coastal Protection and
Restoration Authority for use by the board of commissioners for the Amite River
Basin Drainage and Water Conservation District for use as provided in Subsection
B of this Section.
F. An annual report detailing the receipts, expenditures, and funded activities
of the Watershed Restoration and Conservation Fund shall be submitted by the board
to the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment and the Senate
Committee on Natural Resources by March first of each calendar year.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.